Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-813
Violators; ouster; injunctions; business affected with a public interest; decree.

If, in the judgment of the Attorney General, such corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association against which any civil proceeding may be instituted is one upon which the public is so depending that the interruption of its business will cause serious public loss or inconvenience, he or she may, in his or her discretion, refrain from proceeding to obtain a decree which will absolutely prevent the continuance of such business and may apply for a limited or conditional decree, or one to take effect at a future day, as the public interest shall seem to require. If, in the judgment of the court before whom such proceeding may be pending, the interruption of the business of the defendant corporation, joint-stock company, limited liability company, or other association will cause such serious public loss or inconvenience, the court may decline to enter an absolute decree enjoining it against proceeding with its business and may enter a modified or conditional decree or a decree to take effect at a future time as justice shall require.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 11, p. 640;

R.S.1913, § 4055;

C.S.1922, § 3458;

C.S.1929, § 59-811;

R.S.1943, § 59-813;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 368.

Court may enter a modified or conditional decree or a decree to take effect at a future time. State v. American Surety Co., 91 Neb. 22, 135 N.W. 365, Ann. Cas. 1913B 973 (1912).